Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.118

Revenue warrants authorized.

Municipalities, including any governmental subdivision which may be hereafter authorized by law to own, control and operate an airport, or other air navigation facility, may issue revenue warrants for the same purposes for which they may issue revenue bonds, and the provisions of RCW 14.08.112 as now or hereafter amended relating to the terms, conditions, covenants, issuance, and sale of revenue bonds shall be applicable to such revenue warrants.

Revenue warrants so issued shall not constitute a general indebtedness of the municipality.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 176 s 1.]